Utah statutes.
49-16-507.   Benefits payable upon death of active or inactive member without spouse or minor children.

If an active or inactive member dies and at the time of death the member does not have a spouse or minor children, the benefit payable to a designated beneficiary is a refund of the member's member contributions or $500, whichever is larger.

